Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8510.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration of
Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-5. Grounds for refusal of registration.
The division of motor vehicles shall refuse registration or any transfer of registration upon
any of the following grounds:
(1) That the application contains any false or fraudulent statement, or that the applicant has
failed to furnish required information, or reasonable additional information requested by the
division of motor vehicles, or that the applicant is not entitled to the issuance of registration of the
vehicle under chapters 3 — 9 of this title;
(2) That the vehicle is mechanically unfit or unsafe to be operated upon the highways;
(3) That the division of motor vehicles has reasonable ground to believe that the vehicle is
a stolen or embezzled vehicle, or that the granting of registration would constitute a fraud against
the rightful owner;
(4) That the registration of the vehicle stands suspended or revoked for any reason as
provided in the motor vehicle laws of this state;
(5) That the vehicle has been reported by any city or town to the division of motor vehicles
as having unpaid fines in the aggregate amount of two hundred dollars ($200) or more, including
any and all interest, penalties, or other monetary amount that may be imposed for failure to pay the
fines by a specified date; provided, the registration shall be issued upon presentation of proof of

payment of the outstanding fines, including any and all interest, penalties, or other monetary
amount owed to the cities or towns reporting the unpaid fines. When the division of motor vehicles
denies a registration to any person pursuant to this subsection, the city or town requesting the denial
of registration shall add a five-dollar ($5.00) fee to the aggregate value of the sum of the fines and,
upon payment, shall transmit the fee to the division of motor vehicles. The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to any vehicle owned by a rental company, as defined in § 31-34.1-1;
(6) That the vehicle does not comply with regulations promulgated pursuant to § 23-23-
5(18);
(7) That the vehicle does not comply with the provisions of chapter 47.1 of this title and
any rules and regulations promulgated under that chapter;
(8) That a commercial motor vehicle is being operated by a commercial motor carrier that
has been prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by a federal agency with authority to do
so under federal law;
(9) That the registered owner of a vehicle failed to pay the required toll amounts,
administrative fees, and fines as prescribed in § 24-12-37; or
(10) That the vehicle is a “Kei car” or “Kei truck” and is not in compliance with chapter
19.8 of title 31. Provided, however, that the registrant of any “Kei car” or “Kei truck” which was
validly registered prior to June 1, 2024, shall not be denied renewal of that registration based solely
on the vehicle type; and further, provided that, any such registrations shall not be permitted to be
transferred. Every person lawfully operating a “Kei car” or “Kei truck” shall have the right to use
the public highways in the state including any state highway, through highway, limited-access
highway or public highway or roadway with a posted speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour (35
m.p.h.) or less. Nothing in this subsection, however, shall be construed to prohibit a “Kei car” or
“Kei truck” from crossing a public highway at an intersection where the public highway to be
crossed has a posted speed limit between thirty-five miles per hour (35 m.p.h.) and forty-five miles
per hour (45 m.p.h.); provided the public highway the “Kei car” or “Kei truck” is traveling on and
the public highway the “Kei car” or “Kei truck” is crossing the intersection toward both have a
speed limit no higher than thirty-five miles per hour (35 m.p.h.) and the intersection is controlled
by traffic signals or stop signs.
SECTION 2. Title 31 of the General Laws entitled "MOTOR AND OTHER VEHICLES"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.8
KEI CAR OR KEI TRUCK
31-19.8-1. Kei car or Kei truck.
LC006333 - Page 2 of 4

(a) A Kei car or Kei truck as defined in § 31-1-3, may be operated upon any public way
provided such vehicle is registered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, complies with
all operational requirements pursuant to this chapter, and displays the registration number as
provided in § 31-3-10. Kei cars and Kei trucks shall be subject to inspection as required by chapter
38 of this title. Every person lawfully operating a Kei car or Kei truck shall have the right to use
the public highways in the state, including any state highway, through highway, limited access
highway or public highway or roadway with a posted speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour (35
m.p.h.) or less. No Kei car or Kei truck shall operate on any state highway, through highway,
limited access highway or public highway or roadway with a speed limit greater than thirty-five
miles per hour (35 m.p.h.)
(b) Kei cars or Kei trucks shall be subject to the traffic laws and regulations of the state
and the provisions of this section.
(c) Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall be construed to prohibit a Kei car or Kei
truck from crossing a public highway at an intersection where the public highway to be crossed has
a posted speed limit between thirty-five miles per hour (35 m.p.h.) and forty-five miles per hour
(45 m.p.h.), provided the public highway the Kei car or Kei truck is traveling on and the public
highway the Kei car or Kei truck is crossing the intersection toward both have a speed limit no
higher than thirty-five miles per hour (35 m.p.h.) and the intersection is controlled by traffic signals
or stop signs.
(d) A municipality may, by ordinance, prohibit the operation of Kei cars and Kei trucks on
a laned roadway or local highway or a portion of a highway within its jurisdiction and under its
control, regardless of posted speeds, where it finds that use of the highway or a particular portion
of the highway by the Kei car or Kei truck would represent an unreasonable risk of death or serious
injury to occupants of the Kei car or Kei truck as a result of general traffic conditions which shall
include, but not be limited to, excessive speeds of other vehicles, traffic volumes, use of the
highway by heavy trucks or other large vehicles or if the established speed limit on the highway
increases above thirty-five miles per hour (35 m.p.h.) beyond the point where a Kei car or Kei truck
could safely exit the highway. The municipality shall post signs where necessary to provide notice
to the public of such prohibited access.
(e) The director of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006333
========
LC006333 - Page 3 of 4